Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,130.03
Historical license plates; department; powers and duties.

The department shall design historical license plates with a distinctive design which, in addition to the identification number, includes the words historical and Nebraska for identification. The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to implement sections 60-3,130 to 60-3,134.

Laws 2006, LB 663, § 27.